Connecticut, session 2026, HB05286.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 12-81x of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 The legislative body of any municipality may establish, by ordinance,
4 a program to abate all or a portion of the property taxes due with respect
5 to real property owned and occupied as the principal residence of the
6 surviving spouse or domestic partner, as defined by such ordinance, of
7 a police officer, firefighter or emergency medical technician who dies
8 while in the performance of such officer's, firefighter's or technician's
9 duties.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
HB5286 / File No. 60 1

HB5286 File No. 60
Section 1 October 1, 2026 12-81x
PD Joint Favorable
HB5286 / File No. 60 2

HB5286 File No. 60
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
All Municipalities Potential See Below See Below
Revenue
Loss
Explanation
The bill results in a potential revenue loss beginning in FY 27 to
municipalities that choose to implement a property tax abatement for
the spouses of police officers, firefighters and emergency medical
technicians who die while performing their duties. The bill expands this
abatement to include domestic partners of qualifying officers,
firefighters, and technicians.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of qualifying individuals.
HB5286 / File No. 60 3

HB5286 File No. 60
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5286
AN ACT CONCERNING A MUNICIPAL TAX ABATEMENT FOR
SURVIVING DOMESTIC PARTNERS OF POLICE OFFICERS,
FIREFIGHTERS AND EMERGENCY MEDICAL TECHNICIANS.